Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 7 Adoption of Children
15-7-13.
Consideration of religion of child or parents.

For the purposes of placement of a child in adoptive homes under this chapter, a child shall be placed in an adoptive home of any religious faith or persuasion that may be designated by the natural parent(s) so far as practicable. In the event that the natural parent(s) waive the right to designate the religion of his or her child, the right shall become vested in the governmental child placement agency or the duly licensed child placing agency to be exercised in the best interests of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 26; P.L. 1946, ch. 1772, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 13; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-13

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-14.
Decree of adoption.

If, after investigation and upon a hearing, the court is satisfied as to the identity and relations of the persons, and that the petitioner or petitioners are of sufficient ability to bring up the child and furnish suitable nurture and education, having reference to the degree and condition of the child’s parents, and that it is fit and proper that the adoption should take effect, a decree shall be made setting forth the facts and ordering that from the date of decree the child shall, to all legal intents and purposes, be the child of the petitioner or petitioners.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 5; P.L. 1926, ch. 852, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 5; G.L., ch. 420, § 7; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-14

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-14.1.
Decree of open adoption.

At the time an adoption decree is entered, the court entering the decree may grant post-adoption visitation, contact and/or conveyance of information privileges (subsequently referred to as “Post-adoption privileges”) under subsection (b) of this section to a birth parent who:

Has consented to an adoption or voluntarily terminated the parent-child relationship; or,

Has had his or her parental rights involuntarily terminated pursuant to section 15-7-7(2)(i), (iii), (iv), or (vii) and has properly filed a timely appeal of the termination which is pending and the child was not in a pre-adoptive home prior to the granting of the termination of parental rights petition by the family court.

A court may grant post-adoption privileges if:

The court determines that the best interests of the child would be served by granting post-adoption privileges;

The court finds there is a significant emotional attachment between the child and the birth parent;

The adoptive parents and the birth parents jointly negotiate and execute a post-adoption privileges agreement which is approved by and filed with the family court;

The department of children, youth and families and the child’s court appointed special advocate or the guardian ad litem, if one has been appointed pursuant to §

40-11-12

, recommends that the post-adoption privileges agreement be approved by the court; or if the adoption petition is being sponsored by a licensed child placing agency other than the department of children, youth, and families, the licensed child placing agency sponsoring the adoption makes a recommendation that the post-adoption privileges agreement be approved by the court.

Consent to the post-adoption privileges is obtained from the child, if the child is at least twelve (12) years of age; and

The post-adoption privileges agreement is approved by the court.

A post-adoption privileges agreement filed under subdivision (b)(4) of this section must contain the following provisions:

An acknowledgement by the birth parents that the adoption is irrevocable, even if the adoptive parents do not abide by the post-adoption privileges agreement.

An acknowledgement by the adoptive parents that the agreement grants the birth parents the right to seek to enforce the post-adoption privileges set forth in the agreement.

A birth parent or an adoptive parent may file a petition with the court entering the adoption decree for the following purposes:

To modify the post-adoption privileges agreement;

To compel a birth parent or adoptive parent to comply with the post-adoption privileges agreement;

The court may not award monetary damages as a result of the filing of a petition under subsection (d).

The court may void or modify a post-adoption privileges agreement approved under this section at any time before or after the adoption if the court determines after a hearing that the best interests of the child require the voiding or modification of the agreement. Before the court: (1) Voids or modifies an agreement, or (2) Hears a motion to compel compliance with an agreement approved under this section, the court shall give notice and an opportunity to be heard to the licensed, child placement agency that sponsored the adoption and to the child’s court appointed special advocate (CASA) or court appointed guardian ad litem if one had been appointed prior to the finalization of adoption.

A court may not revoke a decree of adoption because a birth parent or an adoptive parent fails to comply with a post-adoption privileges agreement approved by the court under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 408, § 1.

15-7-15.
Decree of change of name.

If, in a petition for the adoption of a child, a change of the child’s name is requested, the court, upon decreeing the adoption, may also decree the change of name and grant a certificate for the name change.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 10; G.L., ch. 420, § 12; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-15

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-16.
Inheritance by and from adoptive kindred.

A child lawfully adopted shall be deemed, for the purpose of inheritance by the child and his or her descendants from the parents by adoption and the lineal and collateral kindred of the parents by adoption, and for the purpose of inheritance by the parents by adoption, and the lineal and collateral kindred of the parents by adoption, from the child and his or her descendants, and for all other legal consequences and incidents of the natural relation of parents and children, except as provided in §

15-7-17

, the child of the parents by adoption the same as if he or she had been born to them in lawful wedlock. In the construction of any instrument, whether executed before or after May 8, 1956, a child so adopted and the descendants of the child shall be deemed within a limitation to the lawful heirs, issue, children, descendants, or the like, as the case may be, of the parent or parents by adoption, unless a contrary intention shall appear by the terms of the instrument or unless the particular estate so limited has vested in and as to the person or persons entitled to it on April 20, 1962; provided, that this sentence shall not apply in the construction of any instrument as to any child who is over the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of his or her adoption and who is adopted after the death of the maker of the instrument.

When an adopted child is related by blood to the parent or parents by adoption, he or she and his or her descendants shall be entitled to inherit from and through the parent or parents only as an adopted child or descendants of an adopted child and not by virtue of the blood relationship.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 6; G.L., ch. 420, § 8; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3851, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-16

; P.L. 1962, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-17.
Rights of natural parents terminated — Inheritance by child from natural parents.

The parents of the child shall be deprived, by the decree, of all legal rights respecting the child, and the child shall be freed from all obligations of maintenance and obedience respecting his or her natural parents except that the granting of the petition for adoption will not deprive an adopted child of the right to inherit from and through his or her natural parents in the same manner as all other natural children; provided, that the right to inherit from and through natural parents of an adopted child born out of wedlock shall be as provided in §

33-1-8

; and provided, further, that the decree of adoption shall in no way affect all legal rights of a natural parent respecting the child and all obligations of the child of maintenance and obedience respecting a natural parent if the natural parent is legally married to the adopting parent at the time of the decree of adoption. Notwithstanding the rights of an adopted child to inherit from or through his or her natural parents as provided in this section, or as provided in §

33-1-8

, any administrator, executor or trustee who without knowledge of said adopted child, otherwise carries out the administrators, executors, or trustees lawful responsibility shall not be liable to the adopted child for any damages resulting therefrom.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 7; G.L., ch. 420, § 9; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-17

; P.L. 1965, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 195, § 1.

15-7-18.
Denial of petition — Order as to custody of child.

Upon hearing before the family court on any petition for adoption, if it finds that the petition for adoption is not for the best interest of the child and denies the petition, the court shall have the power to order the child returned to the person, persons, or licensed agency legally entitled to custody.

The failure of a person having the physical control of the child to place the child in accordance with the order of the family court shall constitute contempt which may be punished by the court by imprisonment in the adult correctional institutions until such time as he or she purges himself or herself.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 14; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-18

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-19.
Appeal from the family court.

Appeals from decrees of the family court under the provisions of this chapter shall be in the same manner as provided in §

14-1-52

, and any child made the subject of a petition may, by next friend, appeal in like manner, but no bond shall be required of, or court costs awarded against, the child or next friend.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 8; C.P.A. 1905, § 1135; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 8; P.L. 1940, ch. 936, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 10; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-19

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 8; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-20.
Jurisdiction of child pending appeal.

During the pendency of an appeal the family court shall have jurisdiction with respect to the custody of the child and shall make any orders that may be for the best interest of the child. This jurisdiction shall continue after verdict or decision until the final determination of the appeal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 8; P.L. 1940, ch. 935, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 10; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-20

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 9; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, §§ 9, 11; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 62, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 278, § 1, effective August 6, 1996; P.L. 1996, ch. 305, § 1, effective August 7, 1996.

15-7-21.1.
Challenge to decree.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a decree of adoption or a termination of a parent’s right to give or withhold consent for adoption shall not be subject to a challenge or petition to reverse unless the challenge or petition is filed in the family court within one hundred eighty (180) days after the decree or order is entered.

In the event a challenge is brought within the one hundred eighty (180) day period by an individual whose parental relationship to an adoptee is terminated, or by any individual who is asserting a parental relationship to the adoptee, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the family court shall deny the challenge unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the decree or order is not in the best interest of the adoptee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 305, § 2.

15-7-22.
Penalty for violations or false statements.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or who intentionally makes any false statements with reference to the matters contained in this chapter, shall, in addition to any specific penalties provided in this chapter, upon conviction of the first offense, be imprisoned for a term not exceeding one year and/or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), and of a second or subsequent offense, shall be imprisoned for a term not exceeding two (2) years and/or be fined an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 420, § 15; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-22

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 66.

15-7-23.
Complaints.

The director of children, youth and families or any person appointed by him or her shall present all complaints under the provisions of this chapter to the family court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 16; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-23

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

15-7-24.
Attendance at hearing.

The child does not need to be in attendance at any court hearing; however, the court in its discretion may require attendance at any hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-25.
Reimbursement to adoptive parents.

The state shall make funds available through the department of children, youth and families for special reimbursement to adoptive parents in matters of placement of children with disabilities or hard to place children. These funds will be disbursed in accordance with the guidelines to be promulgated by the department of children, youth and families.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 66; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 20; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 20.

15-7-26.
Notice to natural father.

If the court, after examination, determines that the natural father has not joined in a petition either for the termination of parental rights or a petition for adoption or has not executed a waiver, then the court shall cause inquiry to be made of the mother, as the court in its discretion shall deem appropriate.

If, after the inquiry, the natural father is identified to the satisfaction of the court, he shall be given notice in accordance with §

15-7-8

or in any other manner that the court may direct. Proof of giving the notice shall be filed with the court before a petition for termination of parental rights or a petition for adoption is granted. If the natural father fails to appear, or if appearing fails to claim any rights to the child, the court shall enter an order terminating his rights with reference to the child. If the natural father, or a man representing himself to be the natural father, claims rights to the child, the court shall proceed to determine his rights.

If, after the inquiry, the court is able to identify the natural father but his whereabouts are unknown, or if the court is unable to identify the natural father, the court, on the basis of all information available, shall determine whether there is a reasonable probability that publication of notice of the proceeding will lead to the ascertainment of his identity or whereabouts. If so, the court may order publication in accordance with §

15-7-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 6.